Louisiana, session 2026, HB988.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:463.37(B) and (C) and 463.49(B) and (C) are hereby amended
and reenacted and R.S. 47:463.37(D) and 463.49(D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§463.37. Special prestige license plates; retired legislators
* * *
B. The charge for this special license plate shall be a one-time fee of
twenty-five dollars for each plate, which shall be in addition to the regular motor
vehicle registration license fee charged under the provisions of R.S. 47:463 The
department shall collect an annual royalty fee of twenty-five dollars that shall be
disbursed in accordance with Subsection C of this Section. This fee shall be in
addition to the standard motor vehicle license tax imposed by Article VII, Section
5 of the Constitution of Louisiana, and a handling fee of three dollars and fifty cents
for each plate to be retained by the department to offset a portion of administrative
costs.
C. The annual royalty fee shall be collected by the department and forwarded
to the division of administration. The monies received from the royalty fees shall be
used for the restoration efforts of the Pentagon Barracks.
C. D. The secretary shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to
implement the provisions of this Section, including rules and regulations governing
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 988 ENROLLED
the transfer and disposition of the license plates upon the death of the recipient and
governing the design of the plate.
* * *
§463.49. Special prestige license plates; legislators
* * *
B. The charge for this special license plate shall be a one-time fee of
twenty-five dollars for each plate, which shall be in addition to the regular motor
vehicle registration license fee charged under the provisions of R.S. 47:463 The
department shall collect an annual royalty fee of twenty-five dollars that shall be
disbursed in accordance with Subsection C of this Section. This fee shall be in
addition to the standard motor vehicle license tax imposed by Article VII, Section
5 of the Constitution of Louisiana, and a handling fee of three dollars and fifty cents
for each plate to be retained by the department to offset a portion of administrative
costs.
C. The annual royalty fee shall be collected by the department and forwarded
to the division of administration. The monies received from the royalty fees shall be
used for the restoration efforts of the Pentagon Barracks.
C. D. The secretary shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to
implement the provisions of this Section, including rules and regulations governing
the transfer and disposition of the license plates upon the death of the recipient and
governing the design of the plate.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.